Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 19.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201077-1019
Qualified property, defined.

(1) Qualified
property means any tangible property of a type subject to depreciation, amortization,
or other recovery under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or
the components of such property, that will be located and used at the project.

(2) Qualified property
does not include (a) aircraft, barges, motor vehicles, railroad rolling stock,
or watercraft or (b) property that is rented by the taxpayer qualifying under
the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act to another
person.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 19.